North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-71 Biomass Energy Center

15-71-01.
State board of higher education — Biomass energy center.

The state board of higher education is encouraged to establish or name a biomass energy center or centers at an institution or institutions under the control of the board to conduct research and provide education and technical assistance related to biomass production, harvesting, transportation, and conversion.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 496, § 2.

15-71-02.
Biomass research responsibilities.

If established or named by the state board of higher education, the biomass energy center or centers shall:

Complete agronomic research to determine the most efficient perennial grasses or other plants for cellulose production and the amount of fertilization required.

Conduct research to determine the most efficient method of harvesting biomass.

Determine the benefits of biomass densification or preprocessing.

Complete an economic evaluation of all steps in the utilization of biomass for energy.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 496, § 3.

15-71-03.
Ethanol and biomass incentives.

If established or named by the state board of higher education, the biomass energy center or centers shall work to identify and evaluate incentives for cellulosic ethanol production and biomass energy through the legislative assembly or at the federal level. The center or centers shall identify and evaluate incentives for producers, such as providing payment for producers to grow a dedicated bio-energy crop or support equipment, harvesting, and transportation costs.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 496, § 4.

15-71-04.
Funding.

The biomass energy center or centers shall seek funding to continue perennial biomass production research and education.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 496, § 5.